Virginia statutes. Title 63.2. Welfare (Social Services).
Chapter 20. Neighborhood Assistance Act.

§§ 63.2-2000,
63.2-2001.

Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 5.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to Neighborhood Assistance Act Tax Credit, see Article 13.2 (§

58.1-439.18

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 58.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 2, provides: “That any business firm that has pledged in writing on or before January 1, 2006, to a neighborhood organization to make a donation to such organization shall be eligible to receive a tax credit equal to 45 percent of the value of any qualifying donation that is covered under such writing, provided that the donation is made on or before January 1, 2013. Nothing in this enactment shall be interpreted or construed as affecting any other provision of the Neighborhood Assistance Act (§

58.1-439.18

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. For purposes of this enactment, the terms ‘business firm’ and ‘neighborhood organization’ shall mean the same as those terms are defined in §

58.1-439.18

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall in no way affect any tax credit issued prior to July 1, 2008, under the Neighborhood Assistance Act (§

63.2-2000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 63.2-2002.
Repealed by Acts 2009, c. 851, cl. 4.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2009, c. 851, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act providing that a grouping of neighborhood organization affiliates shall not be approved for more than an aggregate of $0.5 million in neighborhood assistance tax credits for all education proposals in any fiscal year shall not be applicable to any grouping of neighborhood organization affiliates that was approved for more than an aggregate of $0.5 million in neighborhood assistance tax credits for education proposals in any fiscal year of the Commonwealth that ended prior to January 1, 2010.”

Former §

63.2-2002

, the Neighborhood Assistance Act, was derived from 1981, c. 629, § 63.1-323; 1982, c. 178; 1984, cc. 348, 720; 1986, c. 407; 1989, c. 310; 1993, c. 192; 1994, c. 611; 1996, cc. 694, 936; 1997, c. 640; 2000, c. 358; 2001, cc. 292, 300; 2002, c. 747; 2004, cc. 216, 699; 2007, c. 788; 2008, c. 585.

§§ 63.2-2003 through 63.2-2006.

Repealed by Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 5.

Cross references.

For current provisions as to Neighborhood Assistance Act Tax Credit, see Article 13.2 (§

58.1-439.18

et seq.) of Chapter 3 of Title 58.1.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 2, provides: “That any business firm that has pledged in writing on or before January 1, 2006, to a neighborhood organization to make a donation to such organization shall be eligible to receive a tax credit equal to 45 percent of the value of any qualifying donation that is covered under such writing, provided that the donation is made on or before January 1, 2013. Nothing in this enactment shall be interpreted or construed as affecting any other provision of the Neighborhood Assistance Act (§

58.1-439.18

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. For purposes of this enactment, the terms ‘business firm’ and ‘neighborhood organization’ shall mean the same as those terms are defined in §

58.1-439.18

of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2008, c. 585, cl. 3, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall in no way affect any tax credit issued prior to July 1, 2008, under the Neighborhood Assistance Act (§

63.2-2000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2008, c. 463 amended former § 63.2-2006. Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 463 was given effect in §

58.1-439.24

.